src/ruleset/rules_phase6.foma
#Rules for handling consonant pronunciation
#Again, it's huge, so it's own file

define InC ["#"|",#"] [\["@"|",@"]]*; #Make sure we don't match stuff like j in vowels, which is an IPA symbol not a letter
define InCNA InC & NotInAntL;
define SB10 [.#.|"-"];

define VUL ["@"|",@"] [\["@"|",@"|"#"|",#"]]* [",#"|"#"];
define VUR ["@"|",@"];

define STVR ["@"|",@"] ["'"|"''"];

define Voiced  [["b"|"d"|"g"|"j"|"l"|"m"|"n"|"r"|"v"|"w"|"y"|"z"] |
                ["β"|"ð"|"ʒ"|"ʐ"|"ʝ"|"ɣ"|"ʁ"|"ɦ"|"ɱ"|"ʙ"|"ɾ"|"ɹ"|"ɻ"|"ʎ"|"ʟ"|"G"|"N"|"R"|"ɮ"|"ⱱ"|"ʋ"|"ɳ"|"ɲ"|"ŋ"] |
                [WithAnt(["\vo"|"\svo"|"\hvo"], [\"}"]*)]];

define DecideS "s" -> "\vo" "{" ... "}" || VUL _ VUR ,
                                            VUL _  Voiced,
                                            VUL _  SB10,
                                            Voiced _ SB10;


define IPACons  WithAnt("\sno", \"x" ?*) -> "ʃ" ,,
                WithAnt("\sno", "x") -> "k" "ʃ" ,,
                WithAnt("\svo", [\"}"]+) -> "ʒ" ,,
                WithAnt("\hno", [\"}"]+) -> "t" "ʃ" ,,
                WithAnt("\hvo", [\"}"]+) -> "d" "ʒ" ,,
                WithAnt("\y", [\"}"]*) -> "j" ,,
                WithAnt("\w", [\"}"]*) -> "w" ,,
                "b" -> "b" || InCNA_ ,,
                #not including a rule for c before e,i,y because I'm includng a rule in stage 3 to autoannotate it
                WithAnt("\no", "c") -> "s" ,,
                "c" -> "k" || InCNA_ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "c") -> "k" ,,
                "d" -> "d" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "d") -> "t" ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "g" "h") -> "f" ,,
                "f" -> "f" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "u") -> "f" ,,
                WithAnt("\vo", ["f"|"p" "h"]) -> "v" ,,
                #Again, g before eiy is already annotated in s3
                "g" -> "g" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "g") -> "g" ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "g") -> "k" ,,
                WithAnt("\svo", "g") -> "ʒ" ,,
                "j" -> "d" "ʒ" || InCNA  _ ,, #Make sure we don't match j in vowels, which 
                WithAnt("\co", "j") -> "h" ,,
                WithAnt("\svo", "j") -> "ʒ" ,,
                "h" -> "h" || InCNA _ \SB10 ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "h") -> "h" ,,
                WithAnt("\co", ["h"|"c" "h"]) -> "x" ,,
                "k" -> "k" || InCNA _ ,,
                "l" -> "l" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt(["\no"|"\co"], "l") -> "ɹ" ,,
                "m" -> "m" || InCNA _ ,,
                "n" -> "n" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "n") -> "ŋ" ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "g" "h") -> "p" ,
                "p" -> "p" || InCNA _ ,,
                "q" -> "k" || InCNA _ ,,
                "r" -> "ɹ" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "r") -> "ɹ" ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "s") -> "s" ,,
                "s" -> "s" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\vo", "s") -> "z" ,,
                WithAnt("\vo", "s" "s") -> "z" ,,
                "t" -> "t" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "t") -> "ɾ" ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "t" "h") -> "t" "θ" ,,
                WithAnt("\vo", "t" "h") -> "ð" ,,
                "v" -> "v" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "v") -> "f" ,,
                WithAnt("\ho", "w") -> "v" ,,
                "w" -> "w" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "w") -> "ʍ" ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "w" "h") -> "ʍ" ,,
                "x" -> "g" "z" || InCNA _ STVR ,,
                WithAnt("\vo", "x") -> "g" "z" ,,
                "x" -> "k" "s" || InCNA _ \STVR ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "x") -> "k" "s" ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "x") -> "z" ,,
                "y" -> "j" || InCNA _ ,,
                "z" -> "z" || InCNA _ ,,
                WithAnt("\co", "z") -> "t" "s" ,,
                WithAnt("\no", "z") -> "s";

define Phase310 DecideS .o. IPACons;
